Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-1620
Governing body; annual report.

The governing body of a plan sponsor shall approve an annual report showing the beginning and ending balance of the fund established pursuant to section 13-1619, deposits of monthly accruals and other assets of the fund, and a separate accounting to reflect required reserves.

Laws 1991, LB 167, § 20.